Utah statutes.
17-2-104.   Certification of election result to governor.

If it appears from the certified report that the lieutenant governor receives under Section 20A-4-304 that a majority of the voters in each of the counties have voted in favor of consolidation, the lieutenant governor shall certify the result of the vote to the governor.

